District of Columbia statutes.
7-2502.11

Information prohibited from use as evidence in criminal proceedings.

No information obtained from a person under this subchapter or retained by a person in order to comply with any section of this subchapter, shall be used as evidence against such person in any criminal proceeding with respect to a violation of this unit, occurring prior to or concurrently with the filing of the information required by this subchapter; provided, that this section shall not apply to any violation of § 22-2402, or § 7-2507.04.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title II, § 211, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-62, § 2, 24 DCR 5780
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-24, § 13, 30 DCR 3341
1981 Ed., § 6-2321.
1973 Ed., § 6-1821.
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 1-85, § 211a, concerning a freedom of information exception, see § 2(c) of the License to Carry a Pistol Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-169, May 5, 2015, 61 DCR 11814).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 1-85, § 211a, concerning freedom of information exception, see § 2(c) of the License to Carry a Pistol Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-447, Oct. 7, 2014, 61 DCR 10765, 20 STAT 4175).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of emergency D.C. Act 20-447, § 4, the act’s applicability clause, see § 2 of the License to Carry a Pistol Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-448, Oct. 7, 2014, 61 DCR 10777, 20 STAT 4187).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 1-85, § 211a, concerning a freedom of information exception, see § 2(d) of the License to Carry a Pistol Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-564, Jan. 6, 2015, 62 DCR 866, 21 STAT 527).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of emergency D.C. Act 20-447, see § 4(b) of the License to Carry a Pistol Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-564, Jan. 6, 2015, 62 DCR 866, 21 STAT 527).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of temporary D.C. Act 20-169, see § 4(c) of the License to Carry a Pistol Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-564, Jan. 6, 2015, 62 DCR 866, 21 STAT 527).